Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-102
Members; credentials committee; report; when waived.

(1) When the Legislature is temporarily organized it shall elect a committee of five by ballot, which committee shall examine and report upon the credentials of those claiming to be elected members, and, when such report is made, those reported as elected shall proceed to the permanent organization of the Legislature. The Legislature shall be the sole judge of the election returns and qualifications of its own members.

(2) The Legislature may waive the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section whenever it is reasonably apparent to the members of the Legislature that there is not, or is not likely to be, a contest of any election result. If the provisions of subsection (1) are waived, the Legislature may, by rule, provide for the certification of members elected to the Legislature.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 4, p. 249;

R.S.1913, § 3743;

C.S.1922, § 3136;

C.S.1929, § 50-102;

R.S.1943, § 50-102;

Laws 1977, LB 231, § 1.